Massachusetts, session 194th, S3155.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Steven 
Kolakoski, a member of the South Deerfield Fire District fire department, may continue to serve 
in such position until reaching age 70, or until the date of his retirement or non-reappointment, 
whichever occurs first; provided, however, that he is mentally and physically capable of 
performing the duties of his office. 
SECTION 2. The Prudential Committee may, at the expense of the District, require that 
Steven Kolakoski be examined by an impartial physician designated by said Prudential 
Committee to determine such capability.  
SECTION 3. No further deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of 
Steven Kolakoski under chapter 32 of the General Laws for any service performed subsequent to 
reaching the age of 65, and upon retirement, he shall receive a superannuation retirement 

of 2 12 allowance equal to that which he would have been entitled had he retired upon reaching the age 
of 65. 
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon passage.